Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 4. Receivers.

Cross references. —

For court rule on receivers, see Civ. R. 66.

Collateral references. —

65 Am. Jur. 2d, Receivers, § 1 et seq.

75 C.J.S., Receivers, § 1 et seq.

Consent of court to tax sale of property in custody of receiver appointed by court, 3 ALR2d 893.

Costs and other expenses incurred by receiver whose appointment was improper, as chargeable against estate, 4 ALR2d 160.

Appointment of receiver at instance of plaintiff in tort action, 4 ALR2d 1278.

Effect of nonsuit, dismissal or discontinuance of action upon previous order appointing receiver, 11 ALR2d 1426.

Inspection of corporate books and records by a stockholder for purpose of determining advisability of receivership, 15 ALR2d 11.

Succession of receiver to statutory right of action for recovery of money lost at, 18 ALR2d 1002.

Appointment of receiver in proceedings arising out of dissolution of partnership or joint adventure, otherwise than by death of partner or at instance of creditor, 23 ALR2d 583.

Allowance of wage claims of employees of operating receiver, 27 ALR2d 720.

Bank’s right to set off unmatured claims as against receiver, assignee for benefit of creditors, or trustee in bankruptcy, of insolvent depositor, 37 ALR2d 850.

Priority as against receiver, of lien for storage of motor vehicle, 48 ALR2d 894, 85 ALR3d 199.

Amount of compensation for services in receivership proceeding in absence of contract of statute fixing amount, 56 ALR2d 13, 57 ALR3d 475, 57 ALR3d 550, 57 ALR3d 584, 58 ALR3d 201, 58 ALR3d 235, 58 ALR3d 317, 59 ALR3d 152; 10 ALR5th 448; 17 ALR5th 366; 23 ALR5th 241; 86 ALR Fed. 866.

Receiver as succeeding to rights under “shop right rule” or license giving employer limited rights in employees’ inventions and discoveries, 61 ALR2d 408.

Corporate receiver as affected by statute denying defense of usury to corporation, 63 ALR2d 946.

Appeal of order appointing, or refusing to appoint, receiver, 72 ALR2d 1009.

Appeal of order discharging, or vacating appointment of, or refusing to discharge, or vacate appointment of receiver, 72 ALR2d 1075.

What amounts to representation of adverse interest disqualifying an attorney for appointment to represent trustee or receiver in bankruptcy, 79 ALR2d 759.

Propriety of appointing receiver, at behest of mortgagee, to manage or operate property during mortgage foreclosure, 82 ALR2d 1075.

Receiver’s personal liability for negligence in failing to care for or maintain property in receivership, 20 ALR3d 967.

What constitutes waste justifying appointment of receiver of mortgaged property, 55 ALR3d 1041.

Modern status of the Massachusetts or business trust, 88 A.L.R.3d 704.

Appointment or discharge of receiver for marital or community property necessitated by suit for divorce or separation, 15 ALR4th 224.

Sec. 09.40.240.
Appointment of receivers.

A receiver may be appointed by the court in any action or proceeding except an action for the recovery of specific personal property

provisionally, before judgment, on the application of either party, when the party’s right to the property that is the subject of the action or proceeding and that is in the possession of an adverse party is probable, and where it is shown that the property or its rents or profits are in danger of being lost or materially injured or impaired;

after judgment, to carry the judgment into effect;

after judgment, to dispose of the property according to the judgment or to preserve it during the pendency of an appeal, or when an execution has been returned unsatisfied and the debtor refuses to apply the debtor’s property in satisfaction of the judgment;

in the cases when a corporation has been dissolved, or is insolvent or in imminent danger of insolvency, or has forfeited its corporate rights;

in the cases when a debtor has been declared insolvent;

under AS

32.06.504(a)

.

History.

(§ 23.01 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 4 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

Section 11, ch. 115, SLA 2000 provides that the 2000 amendment to this section does “not affect an action or proceeding begun or a right accrued before January 1, 2001.”

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10(a) and (c), ch. 115, SLA 2000 set out the applicability of the 2000 amendment of this section during the period on or after January 1, 2001, and before January 1, 2004.
Sec. 10(d), ch. 115, SLA 2000 directs that “If, under (a) of this section, [the 2000 amendment to this section does] not apply to a partnership or limited partnership, . . . , AS

09.40.240

, as the section existed before being amended by this Act . . . [applies] to the partnership or limited partnership.”
See sec. 10, ch. 115, SLA 2000, as set out in the editor’s notes preceding AS 32.06 or as set out in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 09.40.250.
Oath and undertaking of receiver.

Before entering upon any duties, a receiver shall be sworn to perform them faithfully, and shall file with the clerk of court an undertaking with one or more sufficient sureties in the sum the court may direct to the effect that the receiver will faithfully discharge the duties of receiver and obey the orders of the court.

History.

(§ 23.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)